Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201421-2,188
Effect of dissolution.

(MBCA 14.05) (a) A dissolved
corporation continues its corporate existence but may not carry on any business
except that appropriate to wind up and liquidate its business and affairs,
including:

(1) Collecting its assets;

(2) Disposing of its properties
that will not be distributed in kind to its shareholders;

(3) Discharging or making
provision for discharging its liabilities;

(4) Distributing its remaining property among its
shareholders according to their interests; and

(5) Doing every other act necessary
to wind up and liquidate its business and affairs.

(b) Dissolution of a corporation does
not:

(1)
Transfer title to the corporation's property;

(2) Prevent transfer of its shares or
securities, although the authorization to dissolve may provide for closing
the corporation's share transfer records;

(3) Subject its directors or officers to standards
of conduct different from those prescribed in sections 21-284 to 21-2,124;

(4) Change quorum or voting
requirements for its board of directors or shareholders; change provisions
for selection, resignation, or removal of its directors or officers or both;
or change provisions for amending its bylaws;

(5) Prevent commencement of a proceeding
by or against the corporation in its corporate name;

(6) Abate or suspend a proceeding pending
by or against the corporation on the effective date of dissolution; or

(7) Terminate the authority
of the registered agent of the corporation.

Laws 2014, LB749, § 188.
January 1, 2017